California statutes. Water Code
 shall develop and submit electronically to the department and the Office of Emergency Services an emergency action plan that is based upon the approved inundation map or maps.

(4) If an owner of a dam has an existing emergency action plan as of March 1, 2017, the department shall review any inundation map or maps contained in the plan. If the department determines the inundation map or maps are sufficient, as described in subparagraphs (A) or (B), the owner of the dam shall submit the emergency action plan associated with the inundation map or maps to the Office of Emergency Services to review the emergency action plan as follows:

(A) If an emergency action plan existing as of March 1, 2017, contains an inundation map for the dam and all critical appurtenant structures,
 if critical appurtenant structures exist, and the department determines that the inundation map or maps for the dam and all existing critical appurtenant structures are sufficient, the owner of the dam shall submit the complete emergency action plan reflecting all critical appurtenant structures to the Office of Emergency Services for review within 30 days of department approval.

(B) (i) If an emergency action plan existing as of March 1, 2017, contains an inundation map for the dam but not for all critical appurtenant structures, if critical appurtenant structures exist, the department shall review a map included in the existing emergency action plan for sufficiency. If the department approves the map, the owner of the dam shall submit the existing emergency action plan associated with the approved map to the Office
 of Emergency Services. The owner of the dam shall continue to prepare inundation maps with due diligence for any remaining critical appurtenant structures and submit the map or maps to the department for review and approval. The Office of Emergency Services may defer review and approval of the new or updated emergency action plan until the Office of Emergency Services has received inundation maps approved by the department for the dam and all critical appurtenant structures. If the Office of Emergency Services approves an emergency action plan when the owner of the dam is continuing to prepare inundation maps with due diligence pursuant to this subparagraph, an owner of a dam may use that emergency action plan that existed as of March 1, 2017, on an interim basis, pending approval of a new or updated emergency action plan that includes maps for the dam and all critical appurtenant
 structures.

(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, “due diligence” means that the owner of a dam is progressing toward completion of the inundation map or maps for all critical appurtenant structures according to a reasonable schedule proposed by the owner of the dam and approved by the department. When evaluating the time schedule proposed by the owner of the dam, the department may consider, among other relevant factors, the hazard classification of the dam, the number of critical appurtenant structure inundation maps that are outstanding, and the complexity of the failure scenarios. The owner of a dam shall submit a proposed time schedule to the department no later than 60 days after the effective date of the act that added this subparagraph. Failure to submit a proposed time schedule to the department or to comply with a time schedule
 approved by the department may result in the imposition of penalties, restrictions, or liens pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 6425). After the department approves maps for the critical appurtenant structures, the dam owner shall submit a new or updated emergency action plan including the approved maps to the Office of Emergency Services within 60 days.

(b) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall review and approve an emergency action plan no later than 60 days after receipt of the plan from the dam owner pursuant to Section 8589.5 of the Government Code. To the extent possible, the Office of Emergency Services shall give priority to a dam with the highest hazard classification as determined by the department pursuant to Section 6160.

(2) If the Office of Emergency Services determines a proposed emergency action plan does not meet the requirements of Section 8589.5 of the Government Code, the Office of Emergency Services shall inform the owner of the dam and require the owner of the dam to amend and resubmit the emergency action plan for approval. The Office of Emergency Services shall review and, if the emergency action plan meets the requirements of Section 8589.5 of the Government Code, approve a resubmitted emergency action plan within 30 days of receipt from the owner of the dam.

(3) Upon approval by the Office of Emergency Services of an emergency action plan, the Office of Emergency Services shall notify the department and the owner of the dam of the approval. The owner of the dam shall ensure that the approved emergency action plan is disseminated to
 appropriate public safety and emergency management agencies in potentially affected jurisdictions, to the extent these agencies want to receive approved emergency action plans.

(c) (1) The department shall make available to the public an approved inundation map and any schedule submitted pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(2) Nothing in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code shall be construed to require disclosure of an emergency action plan.

(d) (1) Pursuant to the classification by the department under Section 6160, an owner of a dam shall complete and submit an emergency action plan as
 follows:

(A) On or before January 1, 2018, if the hazard classification of the dam is extremely high.

(B) On or before January 1, 2019, if the hazard classification of the dam is high.

(C) On or before January 1, 2021, if the hazard classification of the dam is significant.

(2) An owner of a dam who has an existing emergency action plan as of March 1, 2017, that the department determines has a sufficient inundation map and that the Office of Emergency Services determines has a sufficient emergency action plan pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) is not subject to the timelines set forth in paragraph (1).

(e) An owner of a dam shall update an emergency action plan, including an inundation map, no less frequently than every 10 years, and sooner under conditions that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) A significant modification to the dam or a critical appurtenant structure, as determined by the department.

(2) A significant change to downstream development that involves people and property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 430.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6162.

Any regulation promulgated pursuant to this article shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 88.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Applications [6200. - 6267.]



  ARTICLE 1. New Dams and Reservoirs or Enlargements of Dams and Reservoirs [6200. - 6206.]

6200.

Construction of any new dam or reservoir or the enlargement of any dam or reservoir shall not be commenced until the owner has applied for and obtained from the department written approval of plans and specifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

A separate application for each dam or reservoir shall be filed with the department upon forms to be provided by it, except that only one application need be filed for a dam and the reservoir which will contain the water impounded by the dam.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

The application shall give the following information:

(a) The name and address of the owner.

(b) The location, type, size, and height of the proposed dam or reservoir and appurtenant works.

(c) The storage capacity of the reservoir.

(d) Such other pertinent information as the department requires.

(e) As accurately as may be readily obtained, the area of the drainage basin, rainfall and streamflow records and floodflow records and estimates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

The department may also require the following:

(a) Data concerning subsoil and foundation conditions and the materials entering into construction of the dam or reservoir.

(b) Investigations of, and reports on, subsurface conditions, involving such matters as exploratory pits, trenches and adits, drilling, coring, geophysical surveys, tests to determine leakage rates, and physical tests to measure in place the properties and behavior of foundation materials at the dam or reservoir site.

(c) Investigations of, and reports on, the geology of the dam or reservoir site and its vicinity, possible geologic hazards, availability and quality of construction materials, and other pertinent features.

(d) Such other appropriate information as may be necessary in a given instance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

In instances wherein the physical conditions involved and the size of the dam or reservoir are such as to render the above requirements as to drainage areas, rainfall, streamflow, floodflow, and drilling or prospecting of site unnecessary, the department may waive the requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

The application shall set forth the purpose for which the impounded or diverted water is to be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.

The application shall be accompanied by maps and plans and specifications of such character and size and setting forth such pertinent details and dimensions as the department requires.

The maps and plans and specifications shall be a part of the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Repairs, Alterations or Removals [6225. - 6230.]

6225.

Before commencing the repair, alteration, or removal of a dam or reservoir, including the alteration or removal of a dam or reservoir so that it no longer constitutes a dam or reservoir as defined in this part, the owner shall secure the written approval of the department, except as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6226.

The application shall give such pertinent information or data concerning the dam or reservoir, or both, as may be required by the department and such information as to other matters appropriate to a thorough consideration of the safety of such a change as may be required by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6227.

The application shall state the proposed time of commencement and of completion of construction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6228.

The application shall give the name and address of applicant, shall adequately detail, with appropriate references to the existing dam or reservoir, the changes which it is proposed to effect, and shall be accompanied by maps and plans and specifications which shall be a part of the application and which shall be of such character and size and set forth such pertinent details and dimensions as the department may require. The department may waive any of the requirements of this section if found by it unnecessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6229.

In case of an emergency where repairs are necessary to safeguard life and property repairs may be started immediately, but the department shall be notified at once of proposed repairs and of work under way.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6230.

The proposed repairs and work shall be made to conform to such orders as the department issues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Dams Constructed Prior to August 14, 1929 [6250. - 6253.]

6250.

Unless application for approval of the dam has heretofore been made, every owner of a dam completed prior to August 14, 1929 shall, immediately after the effective date of this part, file an application for the approval of such dam.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6251.

A separate application shall be made for each dam and shall be filed with the department upon forms to be supplied by it and shall supply such appropriate information concerning the dam as the department requires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6252.

The department shall give notice to file to owners who have failed to do so as required by this article, and a failure to file within 30 days after such notice shall be punishable as provided in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6253.

The notice provided for in this article may be given by registered mail and a return receipt signed by the owner shall constitute prima facie evidence of service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Approval of Applications [6260. - 6267.]

6260.

Upon receipt of any application other than an application provided for in Article 3 of this chapter the department shall give its consideration thereto and shall approve or disapprove the same within the time provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6261.

A defective application made in a bona fide attempt to conform to the law and rules and regulations of the department shall not be rejected but notice of defect shall be sent to the applicant by ordinary and registered mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6262.

If within 30 days of the date of mailing the notice the applicant does not file an amended and perfected application, the application shall be rejected and canceled unless for good cause shown the department allows the applicant further time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6263.

No application shall be approved in less than 10 days from its receipt but all applications shall be approved or disapproved as soon as practicable after the receipt of all data and information found necessary by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6264.

Approvals may be granted under terms, conditions, and limitations necessary to safeguard life and property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6265.

Actual construction shall be commenced within one year after date of approval, otherwise the approval becomes void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6266.

The department may, upon written application and for good cause shown, extend the time for commencing construction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6267.

Notice shall be given to the department at least 10 days before construction is to be commenced and such other notices shall be given to the department as it may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Fees [6300. - 6309.]

6300.

(a) The application for a new dam or reservoir, or the enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of an existing dam or reservoir, shall set forth the estimated cost, as defined in this article, of the new dam or reservoir, or the enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of the existing dam or reservoir, and shall be accompanied by a filing fee based upon the estimated cost and according to the following schedule:

(1) For the first one million dollars ($1,000,000), a fee of 3.25 percent of the estimated cost.

(2) For the next four million dollars ($4,000,000), a fee of 2.5 percent.

(3) For the
 next fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), a fee of 2 percent.

(4) For the next thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), a fee of 1.75 percent.

(5) For the next one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), a fee of 1.25 percent.

(6) For the next three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), a fee of 0.75 percent.

(7) For all costs in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), a fee of 0.5 percent.

(b) In no case, however, shall the minimum fee be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) The fee schedule in subdivision (a) applies to complete applications, as described in Section 311 of Title 23 of the
 California Code of Regulations, received after June 30, 2023. Any complete applications received on or before June 30, 2023, shall comply with the filing fee requirements of subdivision (a) as that subdivision read on January 1, 2023.

(d) The estimated project cost may be amended by the dam owner and additional filing fees may be paid to the department up until the date that construction commences.

(e) The department shall annually adjust the fee schedule in subdivision (a) to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index for goods and services published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(f) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a process to adjust the fees to ensure the filing fees collected cover the department’s reasonable costs for application work, which may include, but is not limited to,
 design review and construction oversight.

(g) The department may refund filing fees paid by an owner pursuant to this section if requested by the owner. The department may adopt, by regulation, a methodology for determining the criteria and process for filing fee refunds requested by an owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 30.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

One filing fee only shall be collected for an enlargement to be effected by flashboards, sandbags, earthen levees, gates, or other works, devices, or obstructions which are, from time to time, to be removed and replaced or opened and shut and thereby operated so as to vary the surface elevation of the impounded water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 363.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

For the purposes of this part, the estimated cost of a new dam or reservoir, or the enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of an existing dam or reservoir shall include all of the following:

(a) The cost of all labor and materials entering into the construction of the dam and appurtenant works or reservoir

(b) The cost of preliminary investigations and surveys.

(c) The cost of the construction plant properly chargeable to the cost of the dam or reservoir.

(d) The labor costs of the owner for preparing environmental documentation to meet the
 requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(e) Any and all other items entering directly into the cost of the dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 31.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

The costs of right-of-way, detached powerhouses, electrical generating machinery, and roads and railroads affording access to the dam or reservoir shall not be included among the items used in the determination of cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

An application shall not be considered by the department until at least 20 percent of the filing fee is received, unless the department, in its discretion, decides to consider the application. The application shall not be approved by the department until the filing fee is received in full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 32.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6305.

In the event the actual cost exceeds the estimated cost by more than 15 percent, a further fee shall be required by the department and shall be 115 percent of the amount by which the original fee is less than it would have been had the cost it was based upon been the same as the actual cost. No further fee shall be required, however, if that fee is to be computed at less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 33.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.

Applications for dams found by the department to have been less than 90 per cent constructed on August 14, 1929, shall be accompanied by fees as much less than provided for dams commenced after the date as the percentage of construction found by the department to have been completed on that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6307.

(a) (1) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of fees to cover the department’s reasonable regulatory costs in carrying out the supervision of dam safety, which may include, but is not limited to, the costs of reviewing an inundation map, the amounts necessary to repay budgetary loans, and a prudent reserve.

(2) The revenue generated by the fees imposed under this section shall be adjusted periodically for cost-of-living increases. If the director determines that the revenue collected during the preceding fiscal year was greater or less than the cost to operate the program, the director shall adjust the fees to compensate for the overcollection or undercollection of revenue. The department shall provide a schedule of fees to
 the Legislature and to every dam owner that has a permit or has applied for a permit, when any adjustment is made to the fees under this section.

(3) The schedule of fees adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be based, in part, on the height of the dam on a per foot basis.

(b) A penalty plus interest, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 6428, may be imposed for fees received more than 30 days after the July 1
 required date of payment in any year. This penalty does not apply to any supplemental billing issued by the department.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “height of the dam” means the vertical distance, to the nearest foot, from the natural bed of the stream or watercourse at the downstream toe of the barrier, as determined by the department, or from the lowest elevation of the outside limit of the barrier, as determined by the department, if it is not across a stream channel or watercourse, to the maximum possible water storage elevation.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall limit the total annual fee per dam if both of the following apply:

(1) The dam has a storage capacity of not more than 100 acre-feet.

(2) The governing body of a private school or the governing board of a public school certifies that the dam is used as a subject of study by its students.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall limit the total annual fee for dams or reservoirs located on farms or ranch properties to no more than 20 percent of the fees assessed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “farm” has the same meaning as defined in Section 52262 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(f) (1) Privately owned dams with less than 100 acre-feet of storage capacity shall be assessed an annual fee in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(2) As used in this subdivision,
 “privately owned” does not include dams owned by municipalities, water districts or companies, irrigation districts, private, investor owned or publicly owned utilities, or public agencies.

(g) Any regulation promulgated pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6308.

All fees, penalties, interest, fines, or charges collected by the department under this division shall be deposited in the Dam Safety Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury. The money in that fund shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the administration of the dam safety program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6309.

The fees provided for in this chapter shall be required of any “owner,” as defined in Section 6005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Inspection and Approval [6350. - 6407.]



  ARTICLE 1. New or Enlarged Dams and Reservoirs [6350. - 6355.]

6350.

Immediately upon completion of a new dam or reservoir or enlargement of a dam or reservoir the owner shall give a notice of completion to the department and as soon thereafter as possible shall file with the department supplementary drawings or descriptive matter showing or describing the dam or reservoir as actually constructed, including the following:

(a) A record of all grout holes and grouting.

(b) A record of permanent location points and bench marks.

(c) A record of tests of concrete or other material used in the construction of the dam or reservoir.

(d) Any other items which may be of permanent value and have a bearing on the safety and permanency of the dam or reservoir.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6351.

In connection with the enlargement of a dam or reservoir, the supplementary drawings and descriptive matter need apply only to the new work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6352.

As soon as possible after giving notice of completion, the owner shall file an affidavit with the department stating the actual cost of the dam or reservoir in such detail as the department requires to determine whether a further fee is due. In the event the owner of a new or enlarged dam or reservoir, because of loss of records, recent change of ownership, or other causes beyond his control, is unable to report the actual cost of construction or enlargement, he shall file an affidavit to this effect, stating the reasons therefor, within 30 days after receiving a written request therefor from the department. The department shall then make its own appraisal of the cost of construction or enlargement and determine what further fee, if any, is required. Upon making a determination that a further fee is required, the department shall notify the owner by certified mail of the amount of such fee within 15 days and shall notify the owner that he may appear within 60 days thereafter before an authorized representative of the department to protest the amount of the fee, in whole or in part, determined by the department to be required, and the sufficiency of the appraisal upon which such determination was based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.

As soon as practicable the completed dam or reservoir shall be inspected by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6355.

A certificate of approval shall be issued upon a finding that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water within the limitations prescribed in the certificate. Upon written request by an owner for a certificate of approval, the department shall issue the certificate if it finds that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water within the limitations prescribed in the certificate. Pending issuance of a certificate of approval by the department, the owner of the dam or reservoir shall not, through action or inaction, cause the dam or reservoir to impound water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Certificates of Approval [6357. - 6357.4.]

6357.

Each certificate of approval issued by the department under this part may contain such terms and conditions as the department may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.1.

The department may revoke any certificate of approval whenever it determines that the dam or reservoir constitutes a danger to life and property. Whenever it deems such action necessary to safeguard life and property, the department may also amend the terms and conditions of any such certificate by issuing a new certificate containing the revised terms and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.2.

The owner of a dam or reservoir for which a certificate of approval has been issued shall not, through action or inaction, cause the dam or reservoir to impound water after the certificate terminates unless a new certificate is issued for the dam or reservoir. A new certificate shall be issued upon a finding by the department that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water within the limits prescribed in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.3.

With respect to each certificate of approval or written consent for use of a dam which has been issued by the department or a predecessor of the department and which is in effect prior to the effective date of this article, the department shall, within one year from such effective date, issue a new certificate of approval, which shall supersede the previous certificate or written consent for use, or shall revoke the existing certificate or written consent for use if it finds that the dam or reservoir is not safe to impound water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.4.

Before any certificate of approval is revoked by the department, the department shall hold a hearing. Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed, at least 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing, to the holder of the certificate. Any interested persons may appear at the hearing and present their views and objections to the proposed action. Any petition for a writ of mandate to inquire into the validity of action of the department revoking a certificate of approval shall be commenced within 30 days after service of notice of the revocation on the holder of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Repaired or Altered Dams and Reservoirs [6360. - 6364.]

6360.

Immediately upon completion of the repair or alteration of any dam or reservoir, the owner shall give notice of completion to the department and as soon thereafter as possible shall file with it supplementary drawings or descriptive matter showing or describing the dam or reservoir as actually repaired or altered together with such maps, data, records, and information pertaining to the dam or reservoir as repaired or altered as the department requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.

As soon as practicable the dam or reservoir as repaired or altered shall be inspected by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.

A certificate of approval shall be issued upon a finding that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water within the limitations prescribed in the certificate. Pending issuance of a new certificate of approval, the owner of the dam or reservoir shall not, through action or inaction, cause the dam or reservoir to impound water beyond the limitations prescribed in the existing certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6364.

The certificate of approval shall supersede any previous certificate of approval issued for the dam or reservoir so repaired or altered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Removal of Dams and Reservoirs [6370. - 6372.]

6370.

Upon completion of the removal of a dam or reservoir such evidence as to the manner in which the work was performed and as to the conditions obtaining after the removal as the department requires shall be filed with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6371.

This evidence shall show that a sufficient portion of the dam has been removed to permit the safe passage of floods down the watercourse across which the dam was located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6372.

Before final approval of the removal of a dam or reservoir is issued, the department shall inspect the work and determine that all danger to life and property has been eliminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Dams Completed Prior to August 14, 1929 [6380. - 6382.]

6380.

The department shall make inspections at State expense of all dams in the State completed prior to August 14, 1929.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6381.

The department shall require owners to perform at their expense such work or tests as necessary to disclose information sufficient to enable the department to determine whether to issue certificates of approval or to issue orders directing further work at the owner’s expense necessary to safeguard life and property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6382.

If, upon inspection or upon completion to the satisfaction of the department of all work that may be ordered, the department finds that the dam is safe to the full extent for which use is or will be made, a certificate of approval shall be issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Complaints as to Unsafe Conditions [6390. - 6393.]

6390.

Upon receipt of a written complaint alleging that the person or property of the complainant is endangered by the construction, maintenance, or operation of any dam or reservoir the department shall cause an inspection to be made unless the data, records, and inspection reports on file with it are found adequate to enable a determination whether or not the complaint is meritorious.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6391.

If the complainant insists upon an inspection and deposits with the department a sum estimated by it to be sufficient to cover costs of an inspection, the department shall cause an inspection to be made despite its finding as to the sufficiency of its records to determine the alleged danger.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6392.

If it is found that an unsafe condition exists, the department shall take such action as is necessary to render or cause the condition to be rendered safe and any money deposited to secure an inspection shall be returned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6393.

If, after an inspection is made on account of a complaint, the complaint is found by the department to have been without merit, any money deposited therefor shall be payable into the State Treasury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Inspection During Progress of Work [6400. - 6407.]

6400.

During the construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, or removal of any dam or reservoir the department shall make continuous or periodical inspections at state expense for the purpose of securing conformity with the approved plans and specifications but shall require the owner to perform at his expense such work or tests as necessary to disclose information sufficient to enable the department to determine that conformity with the approved plans and specifications is being secured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

If, after any inspections, investigations, or examinations, or at any time as the work progresses, or at any time prior to issuance of a certificate of approval it is found by the department that amendments, modifications, or changes are necessary to insure safety, the department may order the owner to revise the plans and specifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

If conditions are revealed which will not permit the construction of a safe dam or reservoir the approval may be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

In the event that conditions imposed may be waived or made less burdensome without sacrificing a proper margin of safety, the department may authorize an owner to revise the plans and specifications accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

If at any time during construction, enlargement, repair, or alterations of any dam or reservoir the department finds that the work is not being done in accordance with the provisions of the approval and the approved plans and specifications or in accordance with the approval and revised plans and specifications, it shall give a written notice and order by registered mail or by personal service to the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

The notice and order shall state the particulars in which the approval and approved plans and specifications or the approval and approved plans and specifications as revised are not being or have not been complied with and shall order the immediate compliance with the approval and approved plans and specifications or with the approval and approved revised plans and specifications as the case may be.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

The department may order that no further work be done until such compliance has been effected and approved by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

A failure to comply with the approval and approved plans and specifications as originally approved or as revised shall render the approval subject to revocation by the department, if compliance is not made in accordance therewith after notice and order from the department as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Offenses and Punishment [6425. - 6433.]

6425.
